Utah statutes.
67-19d-301.   Investment of State Post-Retirement Benefits Trust Fund.

(1)  The state treasurer shall invest the assets of the State Post-Retirement Benefits Trust Fund created under Section 67-19d-201 and the Elected Official Post-Retirement Benefits Trust Fund created under Section 67-19d-201.5 with the primary goal of providing for the stability, income, and growth of the principal.

(2)  Nothing in this section requires a specific outcome in investing.

(3)  The state treasurer may deduct any administrative costs incurred in managing trust fund assets from earnings before distributing them.

(4) (a)  The state treasurer may employ professional asset managers to assist in the investment of assets of the trust fund.

(b)  The treasurer may only provide compensation to asset managers from earnings generated by the trust fund's investments.



Amended by Chapter 376, 2012 General Session

